Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1304
Application of sections; exceptions.

Unless the method of disposition is adopted for the purpose of evasion of the provisions of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315, such provisions shall not apply to offers or dispositions of any lot or unit in a retirement subdivision or community by a purchaser for his or her own account in a single or isolated transaction, nor shall such provisions apply to the following:

(1) Offers or dispositions of evidences of indebtedness secured by a mortgage or deed of trust of real estate;

(2) Offers or dispositions of securities or units of interest issued by a real estate investment trust regulated under any state or federal statute;

(3) The sale or lease of real estate under or pursuant to court order;

(4) The disposition in any manner whatsoever of any unit of public housing under the administrative jurisdiction of a local public housing authority;

(5) Offers or dispositions of securities currently registered with the Director of Banking and Finance and under the provisions of the Securities Act of Nebraska; and

(6) Health care facilities licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 693, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 793;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 148;

Laws 2003, LB 61, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 700.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.